Utah statutes.
17B-1-409.   Public hearing on proposed annexation.

(1)  Except as provided in Sections 17B-1-413 and 17B-1-415, the board of trustees of each local district that certifies a petition that was filed under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a)(ii)(A) or (B), receives a resolution adopted under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(b), or adopts a resolution under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(c) shall hold a public hearing on the proposed annexation and provide notice of the hearing as provided in Section 17B-1-410.

(2)  Each public hearing under Subsection (1) shall be held:

(a)  within 45 days after:

(i)  if no notice to a county or municipal legislative body is required under Section 17B-1-406, petition certification under Section 17B-1-405; or

(ii)  if notice is required under Section 17B-1-406, but no notice of intent is submitted by the deadline:

(A)  expiration of the deadline under Subsection 17B-1-407(1) to submit a notice of intent; or

(B)  termination of a suspension of the annexation proceeding under Subsection 17B-1-407(1)(b);

(b) (i)  for a local district located entirely within a single county:

(A)  within or as close as practicable to the area proposed to be annexed; or

(B)  at the local district office; or

(ii)  for a local district located in more than one county:

(A) (I)  within the county in which the area proposed to be annexed is located; and

(II)  within or as close as practicable to the area proposed to be annexed; or

(B)  if the local district office is reasonably accessible to all residents within the area proposed to be annexed, at the local district office;

(c)  on a weekday evening other than a holiday beginning no earlier than 6 p.m.; and

(d)  for the purpose of allowing:

(i)  the public to ask questions and obtain further information about the proposed annexation and issues raised by it; and

(ii)  any interested person to address the board regarding the proposed annexation.

(3)  A quorum of the board of trustees of the proposed annexing local district shall be present throughout each public hearing held under this section.

(4) (a)  After holding a public hearing under this section or, if no hearing is held because of application of Subsection 17B-1-413(2)(a)(ii), after expiration of the time under Subsection 17B-1-413(2)(a)(ii)(B) for requesting a hearing, the board of trustees may by resolution deny the annexation and terminate the annexation procedure if:

(i)  for a proposed annexation initiated by a petition under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a)(i) or (ii), the board determines that:

(A)  it is not feasible for the local district to provide service to the area proposed to be annexed; or

(B)  annexing the area proposed to be annexed would be inequitable to the owners of real property or residents already within the local district; or

(ii)  for a proposed annexation initiated by resolution under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(b) or (c), the board determines not to pursue annexation.

(b)  In each resolution adopted under Subsection (4)(a), the board shall set forth its reasons for denying the annexation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

